Illinois, session 104th, HB2054.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employee Health Savings Account Law 5is amended by changing Section 10-1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 377/10-1)7    Sec. 10-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the State Employee Health Savings Account Law.9(Source: P.A. 97-142, eff. 7-14-11.)